Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-992.01
Termination of employment; employer; duties.

(1) An employer participating in a retirement system established pursuant to the Class V School Employees Retirement Act shall:

(a) Until September 1, 2024, notify the administrator and the board of trustees in writing of the date upon which a termination of employment has occurred and provide the administrator and the board of trustees with such information as the board of trustees deems necessary; and

(b) Beginning September 1, 2024, notify the retirement board in writing of the date upon which a termination of employment has occurred and provide the administrator and the board with such information as the administrator and the board deem necessary.

(2) Until September 1, 2024, and except as provided in section 79-981, the board of trustees, and, beginning September 1, 2024, the retirement board, may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations and prescribe forms as the board of trustees or the retirement board, as applicable, determines appropriate in order to carry out this section and to ensure full disclosure and reporting by an employer and member in order to minimize fraud and abuse and the filing of false or fraudulent claim or benefit applications.

Laws 2017, LB415, § 38;

Laws 2021, LB147, § 27;

Laws 2022, LB700, § 9.